Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2292.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 HF 2292 (2) 91 dg/ko/md H.F. 2292 Section 1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The general assembly 1 finds all of the following: 2 1. The state concurs with President Donald Trumpâs 3 executive order pertaining to ending crime and disorder on 4 Americaâs streets issued July 24, 2025. 5 2. Nearly two-thirds of homeless individuals have reported 6 having regularly used hard drugs like methamphetamines, 7 cocaine, or opioids, and an equally large share of homeless 8 individuals reported suffering from at least one mental health 9 condition. 10 3. Vagrancy, disorderly behavior, sudden confrontations, 11 and violent attacks often caused by a homeless individual with 12 a substance use disorder or mental health condition have made 13 cities unsafe. 14 4. The state needs to create space for many homeless 15 individuals in a long-term institutional setting to provide the 16 humane treatment these individuals need to address the root 17 cause of homelessness and restore public order. 18 Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ STATE 19 MENTAL HEALTH INSTITUTE INPATIENT PSYCHIATRIC BEDS. 20 1. No later than July 1, 2027, the department of health 21 and human services shall apply to the centers for Medicare and 22 Medicaid services of the United States department of health 23 and human services for a waiver of Medicaidâs institution for 24 mental diseases exclusion. 25 2. No later than one calendar year after the centers for 26 Medicare and Medicaid services approves the waiver requested 27 under subsection 1, the department of health and human services 28 shall double the number of inpatient psychiatric beds in the 29 state based on the number of beds that were at each state 30 mental health institute on June 30, 2025. 31 -1- HF 2292 (2) 91 dg/ko/md 1/ 1